Georgia statutes. TITLE 29 Guardian and Ward
Article 6 Compensation of Conservators

29-5-50.
Determining compensation of conservator; failure to file annual returns results in forfeiture of commission.

Other than an emergency conservator or a temporary substitute conservator, a conservator shall be entitled to compensation for services rendered equal to:

Two and one-half percent commission on all sums of money received by the conservator on account of the estate, except on money loaned by and repaid to the conservator, and 2 1/2 percent commission on all sums paid out by the conservator;

An additional commission equal to one-half of 1 percent computed on the market value of the estate as of the last day of the reporting period. This commission shall be proportionately reduced for any reporting period of less than 12 months;

Ten percent commission on the amount of interest earned if it is earned during the course of the conservatorship. The conservator shall receive interest on money loaned by the conservator in that capacity and shall include the interest on the money loaned on the return to the court so as to become chargeable with the interest as a part of the corpus of the estate;

Reasonable compensation, as determined in the discretion of the court and after such notice, if any, as the court shall direct, for the delivery over of property in kind, not exceeding 3 percent of the appraised value and, in cases where there has been no appraisal, not over 3 percent of the fair value as found by the court, irrespective of whether delivery over in kind is made pursuant to proceedings for that purpose in the court and irrespective of whether the property, except money, is tangible or intangible or personal or real; and

In the discretion of the court, compensation for working land for the benefit of the parties in interest, but not to exceed 10 percent of the annual income of the managed property.

Whenever any portion of the dividends, interest, or rents payable to a conservator is required by law of the United States or other governmental unit to be withheld by the person paying the same for income tax purposes, the amount withheld shall be deemed to have been collected by the conservator.

Where some or all of the estate passes through the hands of several conservators by reason of the death, removal, or resignation of the first qualified conservator or otherwise, the estate shall not be subject to diminution by charges of commission of each successive conservator holding and receiving in the same right but rather commissions for receiving the estate shall be paid to the first conservator who receives the property for the benefit of the estate or that person’s representative, and commissions for paying out shall be paid to the conservator who actually distributes the fund. No commissions shall be paid for handing over the fund to a successor conservator. If there is more than one conservator serving simultaneously, the division of the compensation allowed each conservator shall be according to the services rendered by each conservator.

A conservator shall not be entitled to a commission for any sums paid to any conservator of the estate as commissions or other compensation.

Conservators who fail to make annual returns as required by law shall forfeit all commission for transactions during the year within which no return is made unless the court, upon cause shown, shall by special order entered on the record, relieve the conservator from the forfeiture.

A conservator may renounce his or her right to all or any part of the compensation to which the conservator is entitled under this Code section.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-5-50

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1.

Law reviews.

For survey article on wills, trusts, guardianships, and fiduciary administration, see 60 Mercer L. Rev. 417 (2008).

29-5-51.
Reimbursement for reasonable expenses.

Conservators shall be allowed reasonable expenses incurred in the administration of the estate, including without limitation expenses for travel, employing counsel and other agents, and the expenses and premiums incurred in securing a bond. Such reasonable expenses shall be determined after notice, if any, as the court shall direct. The conservator’s commissions are part of the expense of administering the estate and may be charged against the corpus of the estate as well as the income of the estate.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-5-51

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1; Ga. L. 2005, p. 60, § 29/HB 95.

29-5-52.
Petition for additional compensation by conservator.

A conservator may petition the court for compensation that is greater than the commissions allowed under Code Section 29-5-50. Service of notice of the petition for extra compensation shall be made to the ward and to a guardian ad litem appointed for the ward. Service shall be made in the manner described in Chapter 9 of this title and shall direct the parties served to file any written objections to the petition for extra compensation with the court within ten days from the date of service.

After hearing any objection filed by or on behalf of the ward, the court shall allow such extra compensation as the court deems reasonable. The allowance of extra compensation shall be conclusive as to all parties in interest.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-5-52

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1.

29-5-53.
Compensation from corporation or other business entity.

Any conservator who is a domiciliary of this state may receive compensation for services, as specified in this subsection, from a corporation or other business enterprise where the estate of the ward owns an interest in the corporation or other business enterprise, provided that:

The services furnished by the conservator to the corporation or other business enterprise are of a managerial, executive, or business advisory nature;

The compensation received for the services is reasonable; and

The services are performed and the conservator is paid pursuant to a contract executed by the conservator and the corporation or business enterprise, which contract is approved by a majority of those members of the board of directors or other similar governing authority of the corporation or business enterprise who are not officers or employees of the conservator and who are not related to the conservator and provided the contract is approved by the court of the county which has jurisdiction over the conservatorship.

Any conservator receiving compensation from a corporation or other business enterprise for services to it as described in subsection (a) of this Code section shall not receive extra compensation in respect to such services as provided in Code Section 29-5-52; provided, however, that nothing in this Code section shall prohibit the receipt by the conservator of extra compensation for services rendered in respect to other assets or matters involving the estate.

Nothing in this Code section shall prohibit the receipt by a conservator of normal commissions and compensation for the usual services performed by a conservator pursuant to law.

The purpose of this Code section is to enable additional compensation to be paid to a conservator for business management and advisory services to corporations and business enterprises pursuant to a contract without the necessity of petitioning for extra compensation pursuant to Code Section 29-5-52.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-5-53

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1.

29-5-54.
Application for compensation by emergency or temporary substitute conservator; reduction of compensation to conservator.

An emergency conservator or temporary substitute conservator may apply to the court for reasonable compensation after notice to interested parties in compliance with Chapter 9 of this title. The court shall award reasonable compensation to an emergency conservator or temporary substitute conservator and such compensation shall be the only compensation or commission paid to the emergency conservator or temporary substitute conservator for services performed in that capacity. For good cause, including but not limited to services performed and compensation awarded to an emergency conservator or temporary substitute conservator, the court may reduce the compensation due the conservator under other provisions of this article.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-5-54

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1.